Maine, session 132, LD656.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 21-A MRSA §723-A, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by IB 2015, c. 3, §5, is
amended to read:
A. If there are 2 or fewer continuing candidates, the candidate with the most a majority
of the votes cast in that round is declared the winner of the election.